Missouri, session 2026, HB2548.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 451 and 452, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 451.055 and 452.055, to read as follows:
451.055. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Covenant Marriage Act".
2. Persons who have the legal capacity to marry under this chapter may enter
into a covenant marriage by declaring their intent to do so on their application for a
license obtained under section 451.040 and by complying with the requirements of this
section. The returned marriage license shall be designated a covenant marriage license
and shall be recorded as provided under this chapter, with an indication that the
marriage is a covenant marriage. The declaration shall be filed with the recorder of
deeds. Persons may still obtain a standard marriage license, but such persons shall have
the option to obtain a covenant marriage license. For all intents and purposes, the
covenant marriage license provision shall be considered equal to a standard marriage
license and recognized by all government agencies, with all the benefits and rights of a
standard marriage license.
3. A declaration of intent to enter into a covenant marriage shall contain all of
the following:
(1) A written statement of the parties' intent to enter into a covenant marriage
that shall be in the following form:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2548 2
"DECLARATION OF INTENT TO ENTER INTO COVENANT
MARRIAGE
A COVENANT MARRIAGE
We solemnly declare that we believe that marriage is a covenant
between one man and one woman who agree to live together as
husband and wife for as long as they both live. We have chosen
each other carefully and have received premarital counseling on
the nature, purposes, and responsibilities of marriage. We
understand that a Covenant Marriage is for life and that we have
received counseling regarding the seriousness of Covenant
Marriage, including all the legal requirements of individuals
when entering into Covenant Marriage. If we experience marital
difficulties, we commit ourselves to take all reasonable efforts to
preserve our marriage, including marital counseling.
With full knowledge of what this commitment means, we do
declare that our marriage will be bound by Missouri law on
covenant marriage and we promise to love, honor, and care for
one another as husband and wife for the rest of our lives.
_________________________
Prospective Male Spouse
_________________________
Prospective Female Spouse";
(2) A notarized attestation declaring the following and to be in the following
form:
"AFFIDAVIT
BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiants acknowledge
that they have received at least eight hours of premarital
counseling from a priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, any other
clergyperson of any religious sect, or a professional marriage
counselor. The affiants have received counseling regarding the
seriousness of Covenant Marriage, including all the legal

HB 2548 3
requirements of individuals when entering into Covenant
Marriage; communication of the fact that a Covenant Marriage is
a commitment for life; the obligation of a Covenant Marriage is to
take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage even if marital
difficulties arise, including the obligation to seek marital
counseling in those difficult times of marital conflict; and the
limited grounds for legally terminating a Covenant Marriage by
dissolution or legal separation.
STATE OF MISSOURI ____________________)
COUNTY OF ____________________)
_________________________
Prospective Male Spouse
_________________________
Prospective Female Spouse
On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before me, _____
_ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly commissioned and acting
within and for the County and State aforesaid, personally
appeared ______ (Prospective Male Spouse) and ______
(Prospective Female Spouse) known to me to be the identical
persons whose names are affixed hereto, and who executed the
Affidavit, and acknowledged that they executed the same for the
uses and purposes therein contained and set forth.
(Seal)
My commission expires: _________________________
Notary Public _________________________";
(3) A notarized attestation that is signed by the clergy or counselor and to be in
the following form:
"ATTESTATION FOR COUNSELOR OR CLERGY

HB 2548 4
As a priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, any other clergyperson of any
religious sect, or a professional marriage counselor, I attest that
the prospective spouses seeking Covenant Marriage received
counseling from either me or a member of my organization as to
the nature and purpose of Covenant Marriage that included all
the legal requirements of individuals when entering into
Covenant Marriage; communication of the fact that a Covenant
Marriage is a commitment for life; communication of the fact that
the obligation of a Covenant Marriage is to take reasonable
efforts to preserve the marriage even if marital difficulties arise,
including the obligation to seek marital counseling in those
difficult times of marital conflict; and the limited grounds for
legally terminating a Covenant Marriage by dissolution or legal
separation.
_________________________
Counselor/Clergy
_________________________
Title (if applicable)
_________________________
Organization (if applicable)
AFFIDAVIT
BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiant acknowledges
that the prospective spouses seeking Covenant Marriage have
100 received at least eight hours of premarital counseling from either
101 a priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, any other clergyperson of any
102 religious sect, or a professional marriage counselor. The
103 counseling included a discussion of the seriousness of Covenant
104 Marriage, including all the legal requirements of individuals
105 when entering into Covenant Marriage; communication of the
106 fact that a Covenant Marriage is a commitment for life;
107 communication of the fact that the obligation of a Covenant

HB 2548 5
108 Marriage is to take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage
109 even if marital difficulties arise, including the obligation to seek
110 marital counseling in those difficult times of marital conflict; and
111 the limited grounds for legally terminating a Covenant Marriage
112 by dissolution or legal separation.
113 STATE OF MISSOURI ____________________)
114 COUNTY OF ____________________)
115 _________________________
116 Counselor/Clergy
117 On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before me, _____
118 _ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly commissioned and acting
119 within and for the County and State aforesaid, personally
120 appeared ______ (counselor, priest, minister, pastor, rabbi, or
121 other clergy) known to me to be the identical person whose name
122 is affixed hereto, and who executed the Affidavit, and
123 acknowledged that they executed the same for the uses and
124 purposes therein contained and set forth.
125 (Seal)
126 My commission expires: _________________________
127 Notary Public _________________________"; and
128 (4) (a) If a husband and wife have previously obtained a standard marriage
129 license but would like to convert the standard marriage license to a covenant marriage
130 license, a notarized attestation, to be in a form as provided under paragraph (b) of this
131 subdivision, of the husband's and wife's intent to convert to a covenant marriage shall
132 be submitted to the recorder of deeds. A husband and wife who apply for a covenant
133 marriage conversion under this subdivision shall not be required to receive premarital
134 counseling, and the husband and wife are not required to have the converted covenant
135 marriage separately solemnized. The conversion of the standard marriage to covenant
136 marriage of a previously married couple shall not require the attestations by clergy or
137 counselors. Conversion to a covenant marriage shall not make valid a marriage that is
138 prohibited under this chapter or that is not validly contracted in this state.

HB 2548 6
139 (b) A notarized attestation of the intent to convert a standard marriage license to
140 a covenant marriage license shall be in the following form:
141 "DECLARATION OF INTENT TO CONVERT TO
142 COVENANT MARRIAGE
143 A COVENANT MARRIAGE
144 We solemnly declare that we believe that marriage is a covenant
145 between one man and one woman who agree to live together as
146 husband and wife for as long as they both live. We understand
147 that a covenant marriage is for life and that we understand the
148 seriousness of Covenant Marriage, including all the legal
149 requirements of individuals when entering into Covenant
150 Marriage. If we experience marital difficulties, we commit
151 ourselves to take all reasonable efforts to preserve our marriage,
152 including marital counseling.
153 With full knowledge of what this commitment means, we do
154 declare that our marriage will be bound by Missouri law on
155 Covenant Marriage, and we promise to love, honor, and care for
156 one another as husband and wife for the rest of our lives.
157 _________________________
158 Male Spouse
159 _________________________
160 Female Spouse
161 AFFIDAVIT
162 BE IT KNOWN THAT the undersigned affiants acknowledge
163 that they are requesting to convert their existing marriage license
164 to a covenant marriage license. The affiants acknowledge and
165 understand the seriousness of Covenant Marriage, including all
166 the legal requirements of individuals when entering into
167 Covenant Marriage; the fact that a Covenant Marriage is a
168 commitment for life; the fact that the obligation of a Covenant
169 Marriage is to take reasonable efforts to preserve the marriage

HB 2548 7
170 even if marital difficulties arise, including the obligation to seek
171 marital counseling in those difficult times of marital conflict; and
172 the limited grounds for legally terminating a Covenant Marriage
173 by divorce or legal separation.
174 STATE OF MISSOURI ____________________)
175 COUNTY OF ____________________)
176 _________________________
177 Male Spouse
178 _________________________
179 Female Spouse
180 On this ______ day of ______ in the year ______ before me, _____
181 _ (Name of Notary) Notary Public duly commissioned and acting
182 within and for the County and State aforesaid, personally
183 appeared ______ (Male Spouse) and ______ (Female Spouse)
184 known to me to be the identical persons whose names are affixed
185 hereto, and who executed the Affidavit and acknowledged that
186 they executed the same for the uses and purposes therein
187 contained and set forth.
188 (Seal)
189 My commission expires: _________________________
190 Notary Public _________________________".
191 4. The recorder of deeds shall document that the attestations were submitted and
192 shall file all covenant marriage license documentation according to the laws of the state
193 of Missouri. If all the provisions have been met under this section, the recorder of deeds
194 shall issue to the husband and wife a marriage license certificate that documents the
195 husband's and wife's covenant marriage or conversion to a covenant marriage
196 accordingly.
197 5. The state of Missouri shall publish a page on its website titled "Missouri
198 Covenant Marriage Act". The page shall describe the requirements for entering into a
199 covenant marriage under this section and the grounds necessary to obtain a decree of

HB 2548 8
200 dissolution of covenant marriage or a legal separation of covenant marriage under
201 section 452.055.
452.055. 1. A husband and wife who entered into a covenant marriage under
section 451.055 may file a petition for legal separation of covenant marriage at any time,
but a petition for dissolution of covenant marriage shall be filed only after the court has
ordered a legal separation. The court may enter temporary orders at any time after a
petition for legal separation of covenant marriage or a petition for dissolution of
covenant marriage has been filed under this section.
2. Regardless of whether a husband and wife have entered into a standard
marriage or covenant marriage, if there is a court-ordered requirement that divorcing
or separating parents with at least one minor child are required to attend a parenting
education class, the parties may opt for a faith-based alternative program as long as that
program informs the parties of the effects of divorce on families and children.
3. If a husband and wife have entered into a covenant marriage under section
451.055, the court shall require that both parties attend at least forty hours of marital
counseling before a dissolution may be granted. Counseling may be provided by either a
faith-based organization or a professional marriage counselor or agency thereof.
4. If a husband and wife have entered into a covenant marriage under section
451.055, the court shall not enter a decree of dissolution until at least two years have
passed after the initial filing for legal separation or dissolution, and the court shall grant
a dissolution for divorce only after first ordering a legal separation, including any
temporary orders deemed necessary by the court for the following situations:
(1) Either spouse has committed adultery;
(2) Either spouse has habitually abused drugs or alcohol;
(3) Either spouse has committed a felony and has been sentenced to death or
imprisonment in any federal, state, county, or municipal correctional facility;
(4) Either spouse has physically or sexually abused the other spouse, a child, a
relative of either spouse permanently living in the matrimonial domicile, or has
committed domestic violence or severe emotional abuse;
(5) Either spouse has abandoned the matrimonial domicile and has not been in
contact with the other spouse for at least two years and that spouse refuses to return. A
party may file a petition based on this ground by alleging that his or her spouse has
abandoned the matrimonial domicile and is expected to remain absent for the required
period of at least two years. If his or her spouse has not abandoned the matrimonial
domicile for the required period of two years at the time of the filing of the petition, the
action of a dissolution of marriage shall be stayed for the period of time remaining to

HB 2548 9
meet the grounds based on abandonment; except that, the court may enter and enforce
temporary orders of a legal separation during the time that the action is pending;
(6) The spouses have been living separate and apart continuously without
reconciliation for at least two years. A party may file a petition based on this ground by
alleging that it is expected that the parties have been living separate and apart for the
required period of at least two years. If the parties have not been separated
continuously for the required period of at least two years at the time of the filing of the
petition, the action of dissolution of marriage shall be stayed until the requirement of
living apart and separate continuously for at least two years is met; except that, the
court may enter and enforce temporary orders for a legal separation during the time
that the action is pending; or
(7) The husband and wife have attended at least forty hours of marital
counseling sessions over the course of at least two years.
5. Dissolution under this section shall be granted after all other remedies under
this section have failed.
✔